test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ozhaawashkwaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - ozhaawashkwaa: # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaa
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaani
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaawan
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Ind+Prs+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaaniwan
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaasiinoon
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaasinini
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaasiinoon
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaasininiwan

     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaag
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaanig
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaag
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Sbj+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaanig
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3Sg: ozhaawashkwaasinog
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3oSg: ozhaawashkwaasininig
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3Pl: ozhaawashkwaasinog
     ozhaawashkwaa+V+II+Neg+Sbj+3oPl: ozhaawashkwaasininig
